Arkansas, session 2025, HB1932.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 25, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
4-25-111. Annual report for corporations — List of corporations —
Definition.
(a)(1) As used in this section, “corporation” means any corporation or
limited liability company, domestic or foreign, active or inactive, that is
organized in or qualified under the laws of the State of Arkansas and
includes without limitation any person or group of persons, association,
joint-stock company, business trust, or other organizations with or without
charter constituting a separate legal entity of relationship with the purpose
of obtaining some corporate privilege or franchise that is not allowed to
them as individuals and that is exercising, or attempting to exercise,
*JLL322*
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
corporate-type acts, whether or not existing by virtue of a particular
statute.
(2) “Corporation” does not include:
(A) Nonprofit corporations;
(B) Corporations that are organizations exempt from the
federal income tax; or
(C) Organizations formed under or governed by the Uniform
Partnership Act (1996), § 4-46-101 et seq., or the Uniform Limited
Partnership Act (2001), § 4-47-101 et seq.
(b)(1) The Secretary of State shall furnish annual report forms to
each corporation subject to this section by mailing the annual report forms
to the corporation's current agent for service or other person identified by
the corporation.
(2) When filing the annual report, a corporation may state who
is to receive an annual report form the following year if that person is
different from the agent for service on file for the corporation at that
time.
(c) A corporation that fails to receive the annual report forms by
March 20 of the reporting year shall make written request for the annual
report forms to the Secretary of State on or before March 31.
(d) Each corporation subject to the requirements of this section shall
file an annual report with the Secretary of State that shows the condition
and status of the corporation as of the close of business on the last day of
the corporation's preceding fiscal year and other information required by the
Secretary of State.
(e) A newly formed corporation is not required to file an annual
report until the calendar year immediately following the calendar year of
incorporation.
(f) When the par value of the shares of a corporation is required to
be stated in an annual report and the shares of the corporation are without
par value, the number of shares shall be stated.
(g)(1) Every annual report shall contain the following statement:
“I declare, under the penalties of perjury, that the
foregoing statements are true to the best of my knowledge and belief.”
(2) The statement required under subdivision (g)(1) of this
section shall be signed by the president, vice president, secretary,
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
treasurer, or controller of the corporation or other authorized person.
(h)(1) All information contained in an annual report shall be
confidential and not available for public inspection, except for the
following:
(A) The name and address of the corporation;
(B) The name of the corporation's president, vice
president, secretary, treasurer, and controller;
(C) The total authorized capital stock with par value;
(D) The total issued and outstanding capital stock with
par value; and
(E) The state of incorporation.
(2) In the case of an annual report filed by an organization
formed under the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, § 4-38-101 et seq.,
the names of members, except those designated in the organizations' franchise
tax report as a manager, president, vice president, secretary, treasurer, or
controller of the organization, shall be confidential and not available for
public inspection unless the organization has no registered agent for service
of process.
(i)(1)(A) The Bank Commissioner, the Insurance Commissioner, and any
other officer or agency of the state authorized to issue corporate permits or
authorities to do business in this state shall prepare and maintain a correct
list of all corporations organizing or qualifying through their respective
offices or agencies.
(B) Each official or agency shall file with the Secretary
of State a monthly report showing:
(i) The name and address of each new corporation
organized or qualified;
(ii) The authorized and outstanding capital stock;
(iii) The name changes, mergers, charter
forfeitures, or withdrawals;
(iv) The name and address of each corporation that
has provided official notification regarding the dissolution of the
corporation; and
(v) All other information concerning the corporation
required by the Secretary of State.
(2) Upon request of the Secretary of State, each official or
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
agency shall prepare and certify to the Secretary of State a complete list of
the names and addresses of all corporations that have organized or qualified
through their respective office or agency and that are subject to the
provisions of this section.
(3) Officials or agencies of the state, county, or
municipalities authorized to issue permits shall notify each corporation
receiving a permit of the requirements to register the corporation with the
Secretary of State before conducting business in Arkansas.
(4)(A) A corporation filing instruments providing for the
organization of any common law or statutory trust or similar organization
with any county clerk, or other clerk of the various counties of this state,
shall file them in duplicate.
(B) The clerk receiving the documents for filing or
recordation shall file mark them and forward the file-marked duplicate to the
Secretary of State.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-27-128(b)(4), concerning the certificate
of existence for a domestic corporation, is amended to read as follows:
(4) that its most recent annual franchise tax report required by
§ 4-27-1622 has been delivered to the Secretary of State;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-27-1601(e)(7), concerning corporate
records, is amended to read as follows:
(7) its most recent annual franchise tax report delivered to the
Secretary of State under § 4-27-1622.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 4-27-1622 is amended to read as follows:
4-27-1622. Annual franchise tax report for Secretary of State.
(a) Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized
to transact business in this state, shall deliver to the Secretary of State
for filing an annual franchise tax report that sets forth:
(1) the name of the corporation;
(2) the jurisdiction under which the corporation is
incorporated;
(3) the information required by § 4-20-105(a);
(4) the address of its principal office, as defined in § 4-27-
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
140, wherever it is located;
(5) the names of its principal officers;
(6) the total number of authorized shares, itemized by class and
series, if any, within each class;
(7) the total number of issued and outstanding shares, itemized
by class and series, if any, within each class; and
(8) such other information as the Secretary of State may specify
in a form promulgated under § 4-27-121(a).
(b) The requirements as to the applicability, use, and filing of the
annual franchise tax report shall be as set forth in the Arkansas Corporate
Franchise Tax Act of 1979, § 26-54-101 et seq § 4-25-111.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 4-36-401(a)(1), concerning the annual
reports due under the Arkansas Benefit Corporation Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(a)(1) A benefit corporation shall prepare an annual benefit report
and an annual franchise tax report under § 26-54-104 § 4-25-111.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 4-36-401(b), concerning the annual reports
due under the Arkansas Benefit Corporation Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(b) A benefit corporation shall send a benefit report to each
shareholder annually:
(1) Before the stated due date of an annual franchise tax under
§ 26-54-104 May 1; or
(2) When the benefit corporation delivers an annual financial
report to its shareholders.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 4-37-205(a), concerning the certificate of
good standing for a protected series under the Uniform Protected Series Act,
is amended to read as follows:
(a) On request of any person, the Secretary of State shall issue a
certificate of good standing for a protected series of a series limited
liability company or a certificate of registration for a foreign protected
series if:
(1) in the case of a protected series:
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
(A) no statement of dissolution, termination, or
relocation pertaining to the protected series has been filed; and
(B) the company has delivered to the Secretary of State
for filing the most recent annual report required by § 26-54-105 § 4-25-111
and the report includes the name of the protected series, unless:
(i) when the company delivered the report for
filing, the protected series designation pertaining to the protected series
had not yet taken effect; or
(ii) after the company delivered the report for
filing, the company delivered to the Secretary of State for filing a
statement of designation change changing the name of the protected series; or
(2) in the case of a foreign protected series, it is registered
to do business in this state.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 4-37-206(a), concerning the information
required in the annual report of a limited liability company, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) In the annual report required by § 26-54-105 § 4-25-111, a series
limited liability company shall include the name of each protected series of
the company:
(1) for which the company has previously delivered to the
Secretary of State for filing a protected series designation; and
(2) which has not dissolved and completed winding up.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 4-38-212(f), concerning a limited liability
company's annual report for the Secretary of State, is amended to read as
follows:
(f) A limited liability company has satisfied the annual report
requirements under this section if the requirements under the Arkansas
Corporate Franchise Tax Act of 1979, § 26-54-101 et seq., § 4-25-111 have
been met.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1227(b), concerning the Educational
Adequacy Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(b) After the Treasurer of State has made deductions from the revenues
under § 19-5-203(b)(2)(A), the Educational Adequacy Fund shall consist of:
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
(1) All net revenues collected due to enactments of the Eighty-
Fourth General Assembly meeting in Second Extraordinary Session, unless a
different distribution of those additional net revenues is otherwise provided
in the act creating those additional net revenues;
(2) The revenues credited to the Educational Adequacy Fund under
§ 26-54-113(b)(2);
(3) The revenues generated by § 26-52-302(d), § 26-52-316, § 26-
52-317(c)(1)(C), § 26-52-319(a)(2)(C), § 26-53-107(d), § 26-53-145(c)(1)(C),
§ 26-53-148(a)(2)(C), § 26-56-224(c)(3), and § 26-57-1002(d)(1)(A)(ii); and
(4)(3) Other revenues as provided by law.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 19-6-201(3), concerning the enumeration of
general revenues, is repealed.
(3) Corporation franchise taxes, as enacted by Acts 1979,
No. 889, known as the “Arkansas Corporate Franchise Tax Act of 1979”, and all
laws amendatory thereto, § 26-54-101 et seq.;

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 54, is repealed.
Chapter 54 — Arkansas Corporate Franchise Tax Act of 1979

26-54-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Corporate
Franchise Tax Act of 1979”.

26-54-102. Definition.
(a) As used in this chapter, “corporation” means any corporation or
limited liability company, domestic and foreign, active and inactive, which
is organized in or qualified under the laws of the State of Arkansas and
includes, but is not limited to, any person or group of persons, any
association, joint-stock company, business trust, or other organizations with
or without charter constituting a separate legal entity of relationship with
the purpose of obtaining some corporate privilege or franchise which is not
allowed to them as individuals and which is exercising, or attempting to
exercise, corporate-type acts, whether or not existing by virtue of a
particular statute.
(b) However, “corporation” does not include:
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
(1) Nonprofit corporations;
(2) Corporations which are organizations exempt from the federal
income tax; or
(3) Organizations formed under or governed by the Uniform
Partnership Act (1996), § 4-46-101 et seq., or the Uniform Limited
Partnership Act (2001), § 4-47-101 et seq.

26-54-103. Effect upon prior rights, etc.
This chapter does not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities
or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before January 1, 1980.

26-54-104. Annual franchise tax.
(a) Unless exempted under § 26-54-105, every corporation shall file an
annual franchise tax report and pay an annual franchise tax as follows:
(1)(A) Each life, fire, accident, surety, liability, steam
boiler, tornado, health, or other kind of insurance company of whatever
nature, having an outstanding capital stock of less than five hundred
thousand dollars ($500,000) shall pay three hundred dollars ($300).
(B) Each company having an outstanding capital stock of
five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or more shall pay four hundred
dollars ($400);
(2)(A) Each legal reserve mutual insurance corporation having
assets of less than one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall pay
three hundred dollars ($300).
(B) Each corporation having assets of one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000) or more shall pay four hundred dollars ($400);
(3) Each mutual assessment insurance corporation shall pay three
hundred dollars ($300);
(4)(A) Each mortgage loan corporation shall pay an amount
equivalent to three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) of that proportion of the
par value of its outstanding capital stock that its aggregate outstanding
loans made in Arkansas bears to the total aggregate outstanding loans made in
all states.
(B) No corporation shall pay an annual tax of less than
three hundred dollars ($300);
(5) Each corporation, other than those in subdivisions (2)-(4)
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
of this section, without authorized capital stock shall pay three hundred
dollars ($300);
(6)(A) Each corporation, other than those in subdivisions (1)-
(5) of this section, shall pay an amount equivalent to three-tenths of one
percent (0.3%) of that proportion of the par value of its outstanding capital
stock that the value of its real and personal property in Arkansas bears to
the total value of the real and personal property of the corporation.
(B) No corporation shall pay an annual tax of less than
one hundred fifty dollars ($150);
(7) Each corporation actually and actively in the process of
liquidation and which does not rent or lease its property but which retains
its corporate charter or authority for the sole purpose of winding up its
affairs shall pay an annual tax as provided in subdivision (6) of this
section or an amount equivalent to three-tenths of one percent (0.3%) of the
value of its real and tangible personal property in Arkansas, whichever is
smaller, but in no instance shall the tax be less than one hundred fifty
dollars ($150); and
(8) An organization formed pursuant to the Uniform Limited
Liability Company Act, § 4-38-101 et seq., shall pay the minimum franchise
tax.
(b)(1) In addition to the filing fees prescribed by law, the Secretary
of State shall collect a processing fee for each document required under this
chapter when delivered by electronic means.
(2) The processing fee collected by the Secretary of State under
subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall be:
(A) Four dollars ($4.00) when the filing fee is fifty
dollars ($50.00) or less;
(B) Five dollars ($5.00) when the filing fee is between
fifty-one dollars ($51.00) and one hundred sixty-seven dollars ($167); and
(C) Three percent (3%) of the total amount of the filing
fee if the filing fee is more than one hundred sixty-seven dollars ($167).

26-54-105. Franchise tax reports.
(a)(1) The Secretary of State shall furnish notice to each corporation
subject to this chapter by mailing or emailing the notice to the
corporation's current agent for service or other person identified by the
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
corporation.
(2) When filing the franchise tax report, a corporation may
state who is to receive a franchise tax form the following year if that
person is different from the agent for service on file for the corporation at
that time.
(b) A corporation that fails to receive the notice under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section by March 20 of the reporting year shall make written
request for the notice to the Secretary of State on or before March 31.
(c)(1) Each corporation subject to the requirements of this chapter
shall file a franchise tax report with the Secretary of State that shows the
condition and status of the corporation as of the close of business on the
last day of the corporation's preceding calendar year and other information
required by the Secretary of State.
(2)(A) The franchise tax as computed on the report shall be
remitted with the franchise tax report.
(B) The franchise tax as computed on the report shall be
remitted with the franchise tax report on or before May 1 of the reporting
year for franchise tax due.
(d)(1) Every corporation that dissolves shall be required to pay at
the time of dissolution the franchise tax for the prior calendar year and pay
at the time of dissolution the minimum franchise tax for the year in which
dissolved or withdrawn.
(2) Any newly formed corporation shall not be required to file a
franchise tax report until the calendar year immediately following the
calendar year of incorporation.
(e)(1) When the par value of the shares of a corporation is required
to be stated in any franchise tax report and the shares of the corporation
are without par value, the number of shares shall be stated.
(2) For the purpose of computing the franchise tax prescribed by
this chapter, shares of no par value shall be considered to be of the par
value of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per share.
(f) Each corporation which pays its tax computed by the full
assessment of capital stock or property shall not be required to report the
value of its real and personal property within or without this state.
(g)(1) Every franchise tax report shall contain the following
statement:
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
“I declare, under the penalties of perjury, that the foregoing
statements are true to the best of my knowledge and belief.”
(2) The statement shall be signed by the president, vice
president, secretary, treasurer, or controller of the corporation or any
other authorized person individual as determined by the Secretary of State.
(h)(1) Only the following information contained in a franchise tax
report shall be available for public inspection:
(A) The name and address of the corporation;
(B) The name of the corporation's president, vice
president, secretary, treasurer, and controller;
(C) The total authorized capital stock with par value;
(D) The total issued and outstanding capital stock with
par value; and
(E) The state of incorporation.
(2) In the case of a franchise tax report filed by an
organization formed under the Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, § 4-38-
101 et seq., the names of members, except those designated in the
organizations' franchise tax report as a manager, president, vice president,
secretary, treasurer, or controller of the organization, shall be
confidential and not available for public inspection unless the organization
has no registered agent for service of process.

26-54-107. Computation of tax — Penalty — Relief.
(a) Using the information reported on the franchise tax report under §
26-54-105 and any other information received by him or her bearing upon the
subject, the Secretary of State shall compute the amount of tax of each
corporation at the rate or rates provided by this chapter.
(b)(1)(A) If the taxpayer fails to comply with the filing and
remittance requirements under § 26-54-105(c), the Secretary of State shall
assess the corporation a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) plus
interest on the tax and penalty from the date due until paid at the rate of
ten percent (10%) per year.
(B) However, the franchise tax, penalty, and interest for
any tax year shall not exceed two (2) times the corporation's tax owed.
(2) On or before November 1 of each year, the Secretary of State
shall mail notice to the corporation at its last known address stating that
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
the corporation is subject to revocation of its corporate charter under § 26-
54-111 for the failure to pay corporate franchise tax.
(c) The Secretary of State or his or her designee may agree to settle
or compromise a dispute concerning interest or penalties associated with
corporate franchise taxes if the taxpayer:
(1) Disputes the proposed amount; or
(2) Is insolvent or bankrupt.
(d)(1) The Secretary of State may waive any accrued interest or
assessed penalties imposed on a taxpayer due to a failure to remit corporate
franchise taxes under § 26-54-105(c), if:
(A) The taxpayer is reasonably mistaken about the
application of this chapter or the computation of the franchise tax to the
corporation; or
(B) A taxpayer cannot pay the accrued interest or assessed
penalties because of the taxpayer's insolvency or bankruptcy.
(2) The Secretary of State may waive any fees that a taxpayer
owes if the taxpayer desires to dissolve the corporation.
(3) If a taxpayer demonstrates that a corporation was not doing
business in the state for the period for which penalties and interest are
owed under this section, the Secretary of State shall waive the amount due
under this section if the taxpayer demonstrates that the taxpayer intends to
dissolve the corporation.
(e) If the parties cannot resolve the dispute, the parties may pursue
any other remedy available to them, including without limitation remedies
available under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et
seq.
(f) The Secretary of State shall develop guidelines to assist a
taxpayer in resolving a corporate franchise tax dispute.

26-54-108. Taxes and penalties as lien.
The taxes and penalties required to be paid by this chapter shall be a
first lien on all property of the corporation, whether or not the property is
employed by the corporation in the prosecution of its business or is in the
hands of an assignee, receiver, or trustee.

26-54-109. Lists of corporations to be prepared.
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
(a)(1) The Bank Commissioner, Insurance Commissioner, and any other
officer or agency of the state authorized to issue corporate permits or
authorities to do business in this state shall prepare and maintain a correct
list of all corporations organizing or qualifying through their respective
offices or agencies.
(2) Each official or agency shall file with the Secretary of
State a monthly report showing:
(A) The name and address of each new corporation organized
or qualified;
(B) The authorized and outstanding capital stock;
(C) The name changes, mergers, charter forfeitures, or
withdrawals;
(D) The name and address of each corporation that has
provided official notification regarding the dissolution of the corporation;
and
(E) All other information concerning the corporation
required by the Secretary of State.
(b) Upon request of the Secretary of State, each official or agency
shall prepare and certify to the Secretary of State a complete list of the
names and addresses of all corporations that have organized or qualified
through their respective office or agency and that are subject to the
provisions of this chapter.
(c) Officials or agencies of the state, county, or municipalities
authorized to issue permits shall notify each corporation receiving a permit
of the requirements to register the corporation with the Secretary of State
before conducting business in Arkansas.
(d)(1) A corporation filing instruments providing for the organization
of any common law or statutory trust or similar organization with any county
clerk, or other clerk of the various counties of this state, shall file them
in duplicate.
(2) The clerk receiving the documents for filing or recordation
shall file mark them and forward the file-marked duplicate to the Secretary
of State.
(e)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall provide the Secretary of State a list of corporations doing business in
this state and filing tax reports with the Department of Finance and
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
Administration.
(2) However, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration shall not include any information deemed confidential by any
other law.

26-54-110. Dissolution or withdrawal by corporations.
Applications for dissolution or withdrawal by a corporation,
association, or organization cannot be accepted by the authority that
initially authorized or granted an authority to the corporation to do
business in Arkansas until receipt of a statement verified by the Secretary
of State that the franchise tax due has been paid.

26-54-111. Charter revocation for failure to pay tax — Procedure.
(a) On or before January 31 of each year, the Secretary of State shall
proclaim as revoked the corporate charters or authorities of all
corporations, both domestic and foreign, that according to the Secretary of
State's records are delinquent in the payment of the annual franchise tax for
a prior year.
(b)(1) A copy of the proclamation under subsection (a) of this
section, or applicable portion thereof, shall be furnished to each other
official or agency of the state that is authorized to issue corporation
charters or authorities.
(2) Upon their receipt of the proclamation, the several
officials shall at once correct their respective records in accordance with
the proclamation.

26-54-112. Reinstatement of corporations.
(a)(1)(A)(i) A corporation whose charter or permit authority to do
business in the state has been declared revoked by proclamation of the
Governor or the Secretary of State may be reinstated to all its rights,
powers, and property.
(ii) Reinstatement shall be retroactive to the time
that the corporation's authority to do business in the state was declared
revoked.
(B) The reinstatement shall be made after the filing of
all delinquent franchise tax reports satisfactory to the Secretary of State
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
and the payment of all taxes and penalties due for each year of delinquency.
(2) However, reinstatement is not allowed after five (5) years
from the date the charter or permit authority to do business in the state if
the corporation is declared:
(A) Revoked by proclamation of the Governor or the
Secretary of State; and
(B) A forfeited charter.
(b) If the Secretary of State issued the original corporate charter,
permit, or authority, the Secretary of State shall reinstate the corporation
upon payment by the corporation of all amounts due, as provided in subsection
(a) of this section.
(c)(1) If the original corporate charter, permit, or authority was
issued by an official other than the Secretary of State, the official shall
reinstate the corporation upon the corporation's filing with the official the
receipt of the Secretary of State showing payment of all amounts due, as
provided in subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Thereafter, the corporation shall stand in all respects as
though its name had never been declared revoked.

26-54-113. Disposition of funds.
(a) All taxes and penalties collected under the provisions of this
chapter each month shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit
of the Revenue Holding Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund.
(b)(1) On or before the fifth day of the following month, the
Treasurer of State shall allocate and transfer the taxes and penalties
collected to the General Revenue Fund Account of the State Apportionment Fund
until a total of eight million dollars ($8,000,000) has been transferred
during a fiscal year.
(2) After the transfers required by subdivision (b)(1) of this
section have been made, the taxes and penalties collected under this chapter
during the remainder of the fiscal year shall be special revenues, and the
Treasurer of State shall transfer the taxes and penalties collected to the
Educational Adequacy Fund after making the deductions required by § 19-5-
203(b)(2).

26-54-114. Nonpayment of franchise taxes — Definitions.
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
(a) A corporation or limited liability company owing past-due
franchise taxes to the Secretary of State may not:
(1) File forms or documents related to that corporation or
limited liability company;
(2) Create a new legal entity in this state; or
(3) Obtain authority to do business in this state.
(b) A person or individual substantially connected to any corporation
or limited liability company that owes past-due franchise taxes to the
Secretary of State may not:
(1) File forms or documents related to that corporation or
limited liability company;
(2) Create a new legal entity in this state; or
(3) Obtain authority to do business in this state.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) “Past-due franchise taxes” means only those taxes owed three
(3) years prior to the year in which the current filing is presented;
(2) “Past officer or director” means a person or individual who
was associated with the corporation or limited liability company at any time
during its charter that the corporation or limited liability company was
responsible for nonpayment of franchise taxes; and
(3) “Substantially connected” means a present officer, director,
member, or manager or a past officer, director, member, or manager of a
corporation.
(d) An individual who is an incorporator or organizer of a corporation
or limited liability company shall not be considered to be substantially
connected to a corporation or limited liability company that owes past-due
franchise taxes to the Secretary of State.
(e) Each corporation, subject to this chapter, shall file with its
original articles of incorporation or certificate of organization the name of
at least one (1) individual who is substantially connected to the corporation
and is responsible for payment of franchise taxes.
(f) Any current or past officer or director that has been added to a
corporation without his or her permission shall be removed as an officer or
director of the corporation by the Secretary of State and not held
responsible for past-due franchise taxes, if the officer or director submits:
(1) A copy of a report filed with a local, state, or federal law
03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322

HB1932
enforcement entity that states the officer or director has been fraudulently
added to the corporation; and
(2) A statement, prescribed by the Secretary of State, signed by
the officer or director, that states the officer or director was added to the
corporation without his or her permission, with the following declaration:
“I declare, under the penalties of perjury, that the foregoing
statements are true to the best of my knowledge and belief.”

26-54-116. Powers of Secretary of State.
The Secretary of State is authorized to perform any of the duties that
are required of him or her under this chapter.

SECTION 13. DO NOT CODIFY. Applicability and effect.
This act:
(1) Applies only to franchise taxes imposed on or after the
effective date of this act; and
(2) Does not affect a taxpayer's liability for any franchise
taxes that are due or delinquent as of the effective date of this act.


















03/28/2025 4:07:16 PM JLL322